Utah statutes.
70A-9a-808.   Priority.

Laws of Utah 2013, Chapter 215 determines the priority of conflicting claims to collateral.  However, if the relative priorities of the claims were established before Laws of Utah 2013, Chapter 215 takes effect, this chapter as it existed before amendment determines priority.



Enacted by Chapter 225, 2013 General Session 

Enacted by Chapter 225, 2013 General Session

